Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Purgation

117.755.
State
board of elections — Membership, oath. [Repealed.]

117.760 to 117.810.
Purgation — State and county boards — Duties. [Repealed.]

117.812.
Notice
to voters before primary for statewide officers of necessity of transferring
registration record upon moving to another precinct. [Repealed.]

117.815 to 117.885.
Purgation in cities of first class and outside cities of first class — Procedures — Records — Investigations — Fees. [Repealed.]

117.890.
Old
boards continued until successors appointed. [Repealed.]

117.895.
Validity
of registration under prior law. [Repealed.]